Vermont, session 2025-2026, H622.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 14A V.S.A. § 409 is amended to read:
§ 409. NONCHARITABLE TRUST WITHOUT ASCERTAINABLE
BENEFICIARY
Except as otherwise provided in section 408 of this title or by another
statute, the following rules apply:
(1) A trust may be created for a noncharitable purpose without a definite
or definitely ascertainable beneficiary or for a noncharitable but otherwise
valid purpose to be selected by the trustee. The trust may not be enforced for
more than 21 500 years.
VT LEG #385621 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.622
2026 Page 2 of 6
(2) A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by a person
appointed in the terms of the trust or, if no person is so appointed, by a person
appointed by the Probate Division of the Superior Court.
(3) Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to
its intended use, except to the extent the Probate Division of the Superior Court
determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for
the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust,
property not required for the intended use must be distributed to the settlor, if
then living, otherwise to the settlor’s successors in interest.
Sec. 2. 14A V.S.A. § 409a is added to read:
§ 409a. STEWARDSHIP TRUST
(a) A stewardship trust may be created under this section for a business
purpose without a definite or definitely ascertainable beneficiary. The business
purpose may seek economic and noneconomic benefits.
(b) A stewardship trust may hold an ownership interest of any corporation,
partnership, limited partnership, cooperative, limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, or joint venture.
(c)(1) A stewardship trust may be enforced by one or more trust enforcers
appointed in the terms of the trust, and the terms of the trust may provide a
process for appointing successor trust enforcers. If at any time no person is
serving as trust enforcer, the court shall name one or more trust enforcers.
VT LEG #385621 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.622
2026 Page 3 of 6
(2) Each trust enforcer shall enforce the purpose and the terms of the
trust and shall exercise authority as a fiduciary. If more than one person is
serving as a trust enforcer, action may be taken by a majority of the persons
serving as trust enforcers.
(3) A trust enforcer shall not be a beneficiary of a trust created pursuant
to this section, but a trust enforcer may have the rights of a qualified
beneficiary.
(d)(1)(A) A stewardship trust shall have a trust stewardship committee with
at least three persons as members. Each member of the trust stewardship
committee shall exercise authority as a fiduciary.
(B) The terms of the trust may appoint the initial members of the
trust stewardship committee and may provide a process for appointing
successor members.
(2)(A) A vacancy on the trust stewardship committee shall be filled if
the trust stewardship committee has fewer than three members.
(B) A vacancy on the trust stewardship committee that is required to
be filled by subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) shall be filled in the
following order of priority:
(i) by a person designated in the terms of the trust or selected
through a process provided in the terms of the trust;
VT LEG #385621 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.622
2026 Page 4 of 6
(ii) by a person appointed by unanimous agreement of the trust
enforcers; or
(iii) by a person appointed by the court.
(3) Unless the terms of the trust provide otherwise and except as
provided in subdivision (4)(D) of this subsection or in subsection (f) of this
section, the trust stewardship committee may take action by a majority vote of
its members.
(4) Unless the terms of the trust provide otherwise, and in order to carry
out the purposes of the trust, the trust stewardship committee may, after notice
to the trust enforcers:
(A) remove a trustee, with or without cause;
(B) appoint one or more successor trustees or cotrustees;
(C) remove a trust enforcer, with or without cause;
(D) remove a member of the stewardship committee, by unanimous
vote of all other members of the trust stewardship committee;
(E) direct distributions from the trust; and
(F) exercise all rights belonging to the trustee, including the right to
vote stock owned by the trust.
(5) Unless the trust agreement provides otherwise, a member of the trust
stewardship committee or a trust enforcer may resign:
VT LEG #385621 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.622
2026 Page 5 of 6
(A) after at least 30 days’ notice to the trustee, all trust enforcers, and
all members of the trust stewardship committee; or
(B) at any time with approval of the court.
(6) The trust stewardship committee shall submit a report to the trustee
and to the trust enforcers at least annually showing receipts and disbursements
and listing trust property and liabilities. The trust stewardship committee shall
keep the trustee and the trust enforcers reasonably informed about the
administration of the trust and of the material facts necessary for the trustee to
comply with the trustee’s duties under section 813 of this title and for the trust
enforcers to protect the purposes of the trust.
(e)(1) A trustee of a stewardship trust shall act in accordance with a
direction from the trust stewardship committee unless the action is manifestly
contrary to the terms of the trust or the trustee knows that the action would
constitute a serious breach of a fiduciary duty that the trust stewardship
committee, the trust enforcer, or the trustee owes to the trust.
(2) A trustee shall be liable only for willful misconduct and shall not be
liable for reliance on documents provided by the trust stewardship committee
or the trust enforcer.
(f) Unless the terms of the trust provide otherwise, the trust stewardship
committee and the trust enforcers, acting together, may modify or terminate a
VT LEG #385621 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.622
2026 Page 6 of 6
stewardship trust by unanimous agreement of the members of the trust
stewardship committee and unanimous agreement of the trust enforcers.
(g) Upon termination of a stewardship trust, the trustee shall distribute all
remaining trust property as the terms of the trust provide, or if the terms of the
trust do not provide for complete distribution of the property, as the court
determines to be consistent with the purposes for which the trust was created.
(h)(1) A person serving as a trustee shall not serve as a trust enforcer or as
a member of the trust stewardship committee.
(2) A person serving as a trust enforcer shall not serve as a member of
the trust stewardship committee.
(i) This section shall not apply to a trust created pursuant to 11A V.S.A.
§ 7.30.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385621 v.1